Maryland, session 2025, HB1322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–740.2.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT OPERATE A GASOLINE–POWERED VESSEL
MANUFACTURED AFTER JULY 31, 2007, THAT HAS ACCOMMODATION SPACES, SWIM
PLATFORMS, OR AFT LOUNGING AREAS ON THE WATERS OF THE STATE UNLESS THE
VESSEL HAS CARBON MONOXIDE WARNING LABELS AFFIXED IN CONSPICUOUS
LOCATIONS IN THE VICINITY OF BOTH THE TRANSOM AND THE HELM OF THE VESSEL.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT IMPOSE A PENALTY ON A PERSON THAT
VIOLATES THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.